Donald Trump|Speech: Donald Trump in San Jose, CA|June 2, 2016
[This was transcribed and punctuated by Factba.se's AI, Margaret, and automatically corrected based on her understanding of Donald Trump's speech patterns. It has not been edited by a human. Please double-check any quotes against the video.]
This is great, this is free, this is great, this is free, this is great. This is free. Thank you. Thank you very much everybody. Thank you. Thank you very much everybody. Thank you. Thank you very much everybody. What an honor, what an honor, what an honor? Thank You. Latinos for jump, that's what I Thank You.
Latinos for jump, that's what I Thank You. Latinos for jump, that's what I like. I love that Latinos we're doing like I love that Latinos we're doing like I love that Latinos, we're doing wrong with Latinos. Nobody knows about it wrong with Latinos. Nobody knows about it wrong with Latinos. Nobody knows about it yet.
We're bringing so many jobs in you yet. We're bringing so many jobs in you yet. We're bringing so many jobs in. You watch what happens. The Hispanics, we love, watch what happens. The Hispanics, we love, watch what happens. The Hispanics, we love the Hispanics. Thank you everybody. So, so the Hispanics, thank you everybody.
So, so the Hispanics, thank you everybody. So, so I said to my people what the hell are. I said to my people what the hell are, I said to my people, what the hell are you doing, who's going to come tonight? You doing who's going to come tonight, you doing who's going to come tonight. You have San Francisco playing the game.
You have San Francisco playing the game, you have San Francisco playing the game tonight and look at this crowd, this is tonight and look at this crowd, this is tonight and look at this crowd. This is unbelievable. Wow, we'll speak a little bit faster tonight. We'll speak a little bit faster tonight. We'll speak a little bit faster tonight.
So you go home to the game. Okay, no, no, no. So you go home to the game. Okay, no, no, no. So you go home to the game. Okay, no, no, no. Let's take our time anyway. Well, thank - let's take our time anyway. Well, thank, let's take our time anyway. Well, thank you all very much. It's been an amazing you all very much.
It's been an amazing you all very much. It's been an amazing period of time. You know, you had the 1237 period of time, you know, you had the 1237 period of time, you know, you had the 1237, right, 1237 delegates and I promised right, 1237 delegates and I promised right, 1237 delegates. And I promised everybody, I told everybody we were going.
Everybody, I told everybody we were going everybody, I told everybody we were going to hit that number and now we're going to hit that number and now we're going to hit that number and now we're going to hit a number that's way, way above way to hit A number that's way, way above way to hit a number that's way, way above way, way remember they all said all you have way remember they all said all you have way.
Remember, they all said all you have the convention and the convention is the convention and the convention is the convention and the convention is going to be a big deal. And I said we're going to be a big deal. And I said we're going to be a big deal and I said we're not going to the convention for that, not going to the convention for that, not going to the convention for that.
We're going to the convention as victors. We're going to the convention as victors. We're going to the convention as victors before the convention ever starts so before the convention ever starts so before the convention ever starts. So we're gonna have a great time in Ohio. We're gonna have a great time in Ohio.
We're gonna have a great time in Ohio. We're gonna have a great time in - we're gonna have a great time in - we're gonna have a great time in Cleveland, Ohio. And I really appreciate Cleveland, Ohio and I really appreciate Cleveland, Ohio and I really appreciate this turnout, this is fantastic. I really this turnout, this is fantastic.
I really this turnout, this is fantastic, I really do so on Tuesday you got a big vote coming. So on Tuesday, you got a big vote coming. So on Tuesday you got a big vote coming up. I mean honestly up, I mean honestly up. I mean, honestly we already won, but in terms - in terms of we already won. But in terms - in terms of - we already won, but in terms - in terms of mandate, in terms of going out there and mandate in terms of going out there and mandate in terms of going out there and really getting it.
I hope you can go out really getting it. I hope you can go out really getting it. I hope you can go out vote and you know we have a few states vote and you know we have a few states vote and you know we have a few states, right? It's the end, it's the end now, right? It's the end. It's the end now, right?
It's the end, it's the end. Now here's what's important in the history. Here's what's important in the history. Here's what's important in the history of the Republican Party Dwight, the of the Republican Party Dwight, the of the Republican Party Dwight. The Eisenhower. Ronald Reagan, everybody Eisenhower Ronald Reagan, everybody Eisenhower Ronald Reagan, everybody everybody in history we have the most everybody in history, we have the most everybody in history.
We have the most votes ever cast for a Republican votes ever cast for a Republican votes ever cast. For a Republican candidate never happened before and by candidate never happened before and by candidate never happened before and by millions by millions by millions of us millions by millions by millions of us millions by millions by millions of us.
And the amazing thing about that is I - and the amazing thing about that is I - and the amazing thing about that is I think we do even better in November. Think we do even better in November. Think we do even better in November because we're going to take a lot of - because we're going to take a lot of - because we're going to take a lot of people from the Democrats, you know people from the Democrats, you know people from the Democrats.
You know, Bernie Sanders - Bernie Sanders, the system, Bernie Sanders, Bernie Sanders, the system, Bernie Sanders, Bernie Sanders, the system was rigged on him. I think we're going to - was rigged on him. I think we're going to - was rigged on him. I think we're going to get a lot of people from Bernie, we'll get a lot of people from Bernie.
We'll get a lot of people from Bernie. We'll see what happens. I mean, I watched see what happens. I mean I watched see what happens. I mean, I watched Hillary today, it was pathetic. It was Hillary. Today, it was pathetic. It was Hillary. Today, it was pathetic. It was pathetic, pathetic, pathetic. It was so sad to watch and you know, it was so sad to watch and you know, it was so sad to watch and you know she's up there and supposed to be a - she's up there and supposed to be a - she's up there and supposed to Be a foreign policy speech, it was a political foreign policy speech.
It was a political foreign policy speech. It was a political speech, had nothing to do with foreign speech. Had nothing to do with foreign speech had nothing to do with foreign policy policy policy. She made a political speech tonight. She made a political speech tonight. She made a political speech tonight, folks, and it was a pretty pathetic deal folks.
And it was a pretty pathetic deal folks. And it was a pretty pathetic deal. But listen on Tuesday, so we have - but listen on Tuesday, so we have - but listen on Tuesday. So we have California, we have Montana, we have New California, we have Montana, we have New California, we have Montana, we have New Jersey, we have New Mexico, we have South Jersey, we have New Mexico, we have South Jersey, we have New Mexico, we have South Dakota.
So we have those states and Dakota, so we have those states and Dakota. So we have those states and that's the end. And at the end of the - that's the end and at the end of the - that's the end and at the end of the night, we will be many, many, many millions night. We will be many, many, many millions night.
We will be many, many, many millions of votes ahead of the highest vote of votes ahead of the highest vote of votes ahead of the highest vote getter in history. And that tells us getter in history and that tells us getter in history. And that tells us right now you're a hell of a crowd, you right now you're a hell of a crowd, you right now you're a hell of a crowd, you don't like basketball very much.
You are don't like basketball very much. You are - don't like basketball very much. You are a great crowd there. Thank you. I love you. A great crowd there. Thank you. I love you. A great crowd there. Thank you. I love you. I love you. I love you. I love you. I love you folks. I'm telling you, so we - I love you folks, I'm telling you.
So we - I love you folks, I'm telling you. So we - we are in a movement. They've never seen - we are in a movement. They've never seen - we are in a movement. They've never seen anything like it, anything like it, anything like it, some people, many people, even people that some people, many people, even people that some people, many people, even people that hate me, the pundits who are totally hate me, the pundits who are totally hate me, The pundits who are totally dishonest by the way, but that's okay dishonest by the way, but that's okay.
Dishonest by the way. But that's okay. Some of these pundits have even said some of these pundits have even said some of these pundits have even said almost all of them, that there's never almost all of them that there's never almost all of them that there's never been anything like this that's ever been.
Anything like this that's ever been, anything like this that's ever happened in the United States, never been happened in the United States, never been happened in the United States, never been hazy. Yesterday, we had an amazing crowd hazy. Yesterday, we had an amazing crowd hazy. Yesterday. We had an amazing crowd.
We had these airport hangars packed with. We had these airport hangars packed with. We had these airport hangars packed with people and a friend of mine said I loved people and a friend of mine said I loved people and a friend of mine said. I loved your speech yesterday, you know it's at your speech yesterday, you know it's at your speech yesterday, you know it's at all the networks.
It's all over the place, all the networks. It's all over the place, all the networks. It's all over the place. He said were there any people there? I he said were there any people there? I he said were there any people there? I said, yeah, it could have been like 20,000 said, yeah, it could have been like 20,000 said, yeah, it could have been like 20,000 people, people, people I couldn't tell.
They never show the - I couldn't tell. They never show the - I couldn't tell. They never show the people they never ever show it, but who people they never ever show it but who people they never ever show it. But who cares? Do we agree? Who cares? People are cares, do we agree? Who cares? People are cares, do we agree?
Who cares, people are getting it, people are getting the idea, getting it, people are getting the idea, getting it, people are getting the idea, people are getting the idea. So what we people are getting the idea. So what we people are getting the idea. So what we have to do is, is we have a movement have to do is, is we have a movement have to do is is we have a movement going on.
We're on the cover of every going on. We're on the cover of every going on. We're on the cover of every newspaper, every magazine, Time magazine, newspaper, every magazine, Time magazine, newspaper, every magazine, Time magazine. Many times I just learned they're doing many times. I just learned they're doing many times.
I just learned they're doing yet another cover or drop. I love that yet another cover or drop, I love that yet another cover or drop. I love that you know Time magazine is a good, you know, Time magazine is a good, you know Time magazine is a good magazine, you grew up reading Time magazine, you grew up reading Time magazine you grew up reading Time magazine who ever thought you'd be on Magazine who ever thought you'd be on magazine who ever thought you'd be on the cover of Time magazine especially.
So the cover of Time magazine especially. So the cover of Time magazine, especially so much and it's all about the movement much and it's all about the movement much and it's all about the movement. It's all about the fact that we're - it's all about the fact that we're - it's all about the fact that we're taking back our country and by the way, taking back our country and by the way, taking back our country.
And by the way, we're going to be very inclusive to - we're going to be very inclusive to - we're going to be very - inclusive to everybody. We're going to be very - everybody. We're going to be very - everybody. We're going to be very inclusive to everybody. I know we have a - inclusive to everybody. I know we have a - inclusive to everybody.
I know we have a lot of people. They're angry at what's lot of people. They're angry at what's lot of people. They're angry at what's happened. We have a lot of smart people happened. We have a lot of smart people happened. We have a lot of smart people that are making less money now than they that are making less money now than they that are making less money now than they did eighteen years ago and they're did eighteen years ago and they're did eighteen years ago and they're Working twice as hard, okay, we are going working twice as hard, okay?
We are going working twice as hard, okay? We are going to bring our jobs back folks. We're going to bring our jobs back folks. We're going to bring our jobs back folks. We're going to bring back sanity to our country to bring back sanity to our country to bring back sanity to our country gonna bring those jobs back.
And we're not gonna let the jobs go. So and we're not gonna let the jobs go. So and we're not gonna let the jobs go so easy. You know, I took all the time about easy, you know, I took all the time about easy, you know, I took all the time about Ford and karya. Dollars, we get nothing of that deal dollars.
We get nothing of that deal, nothing except laughed at and scorned, nothing except laughed at and scorned, nothing except laughed at and scorned. And then I watch Hillary Clinton, she and then I watch Hillary Clinton, she and then I watch Hillary Clinton. She started the foundation of that deal and started the foundation of that deal and started the foundation of that deal, and now she's proud of it, but she's only now - she's proud of it, but she's only now.
She's proud of it, but she's only proud of it. For one reason you know why proud of it for one reason you know why proud of it for one reason you know why because Obama wants it anything Obama because Obama wants it anything Obama because Obama wants it, anything Obama wants she's going forward with because wants She's going forward with because wants she's going forward with because you know why she doesn't want to go to, you know why she doesn't want to go to, you know why she doesn't want to go to jail.
That's why folks jail. That's why folks jail. That's why folks, that's why - that's why - that's why - remember, Hillary Clinton used to hate - remember, Hillary Clinton used to hate - remember, Hillary Clinton used to hate Obama. She's to hate him. Bill. Clinton Obama, she's to hate him. Bill. Clinton Obama.
She's to hate him. Bill Clinton hated him hated him, hated him Bill Clinton, hated him, he called Bill Bill Clinton, hated him. He called Bill Bill Clinton, hated him, he called Bill Clinton, a racist. You remember that Bill Clinton, a racist, you remember that Bill Clinton, a racist, you remember that Bill Clinton hated him and Hillary Clinton Clinton hated him and Hillary Clinton Clinton hated him and Hillary Clinton hated Obama.
Now it's - yes, sir. Mr. hated Obama now it's yes, sir. Mr. hated Obama, now it's yes sir. Mr. president, sir, yes sir, what would you - president sir? Yes sir. What would you president sir? Yes sir. What would you - like, what would you like me to say here? Like what would you like me to say here? Like what would you like me to say here, sir?
Sir? Sir? The only reason she's behaving like this, the only reason she's behaving like this, the only reason she's behaving like this and the only reason she's been dragged and the only reason she's been dragged. And the only reason she's been dragged so far left, believe me is she doesn't so far left.
Believe me is she doesn't so far left. Believe me is she doesn't want to go to jail over the emails. Okay, want to go to jail over the emails. Okay. Want to go to jail over the emails, okay. Believe me that's the only reason. One believe me that's the only reason. One believe me that's the only reason - one simple reason because you know what simple reason, because you know what simple reason because you know what folks, folks, folks I used to say leave it up to the lawyers.
I used to say leave it up to the lawyers. I used to say leave it up to the lawyers. I have watched so many lawyers or in - so I have watched so many lawyers or in - so I have watched so many lawyers or in so many different networks. I have read so many different networks. I have read so many different networks.
I have read so much about the emails folks. Honestly much about the emails folks, honestly much about the emails folks. Honestly, she's guilty as hell. He's just in this. She's guilty as hell. He's just in this. She's guilty as hell. He's just in this, huh and the fact that they even left and - and the fact that they even left and - and the fact that they even left and this is true, the fact that they - even this is true, the fact that they - even this is true, the Fact that they even allow her to participate in this race is allow her to participate in this race is allow her to participate in this race is a disgrace to the United States.
It's a a disgrace to the United States. It's a a disgrace to the United States. It's a disgrace to our nation to disgrace disgrace to our nation to disgrace disgrace to our nation to disgrace. So we'll see. We'll see what happens, I - so we'll see. We'll see what happens. I - so we'll see. We'll see what happens.
I don't know. I've always had great don't know. I've always had great don't know. I've always had great confidence in the FBI. I must tell you confidence in the FBI. I must tell you confidence in the FBI. I must tell you have great respect. I know some FBI folks have great respect. I know some FBI folks have great respect.
I know some FBI folks, I've always had great confidence in them. I've always had great confidence in them. I've always had great confidence in them. I can't believe that they would let this. I can't believe that they would let this. I can't believe that they would let this go. When you look at General Petraeus, he go, when you look at General Petraeus, he go, when you look at General Petraeus, he got the equivalent of two years.
He did got the equivalent of two years. He did got the equivalent of two years. He did nothing compared to her. You look at some nothing compared to her. You look at some nothing compared to her. You look at some of these other people, their lives have of these other people, their lives, have of these other people, their lives have been destroyed.
What she did is 20 times been destroyed. What she did is 20 times been destroyed. What she did is 20 times worse what she did and now our guys are worse what she did and now our guys are worse what she did and now our guys are taking the Fifth Amendment or the whole taking the Fifth Amendment or the whole taking the Fifth Amendment or the whole thing, it's a mess and she keeps running thing, it's a mess and she keeps running thing.
It's a mess and she keeps running like this, nothing, no problem like this, nothing, no problem like this, nothing, no problem. I'm telling you this is a great system. I'm telling you this is a great system. I'm telling you this is a great system we have. We have a great country. We're - we have - we have a great country.
We're - we have - we have a great country, we're gonna make it a lot greater by the way gonna make it a lot greater by the way gonna make it a lot greater by the way. But we have a great - we love our country, but we have a great - we love our country, but we have a great - we love our country. Look, we love our country and I don't look, we love our country and I don't look, we love our country and I don't believe our country can let her get away.
Believe our country can let her get away, believe our country can let her get away with this crime. I don't believe it. So with this crime, I don't believe it. So with this crime I don't believe it. So we'll see and you know what if they do, we'll see and you know what if they do, we'll see and you know what, if they do let her get away with it, it will be a let her get away with it.
It will be a let her get away with it. It will be a big topic of conversation on the big topic of conversation on the big topic of conversation on the campaign trail, I can tell you that fuck and then if I win, it's called the five-year statute of it's called the five-year statute of it's called The five-year statute of limitations, if I win now everything's limitations.
If I win now everything's limitations. If I win now everything's gonna be fair, but I'm sure the Attorney gonna be fair, but I'm sure the Attorney gonna be fair. But I'm sure the Attorney General will take a very good look at it. General will take a very good look at it. General will take a very good look at it from the fair standpoint.
Okay, I'm sure I think it's disgraceful. So we have a very think it's disgraceful, so we have a very think it's disgraceful. So we have a very important race. We're doing amazingly important race. We're doing amazingly important race. We're doing amazingly well. Some of the pundits are saying the - well, some of the pundits are saying the well, some of the pundits are saying the most phenomenal thing they've ever seen most phenomenal thing they've ever seen most phenomenal thing they've ever seen in government.
Newt Gingrich said the - in government, Newt Gingrich said the in government, Newt Gingrich said the other night. There's never been anything other night. There's never been anything other night. There's never been anything like this and he's a historian, a great like this, and he's a historian, a great like this and he's a historian, a great historian, historian.
Historian, there's never been anything like this in - there's never been anything like this in - there's never been anything like this in the history of our country. We go like the history of our country. We go like the history of our country. We go like this crowd. We have great crowds right? We this crowd we have great crowds right?
We this crowd we have great crowds, right? We always have great crowds. I mean look at always have great crowds. I mean look at always have great crowds. I mean, look at this place, amazing, this is amazing, hey, camera, amazing. This is amazing, hey, camera, amazing. This is amazing. Hey, camera spotting, you take a look at this, please spotting.
You take a look at this, please spotting. You take a look at this please. If you would then our turn the other night crazy Vernon, he's that the other night crazy Vernon. He's that the other night crazy Vernon. He's that crazy guy, but he's doing up. He is nuts, crazy guy, but he's doing up. He is nuts, crazy guy, but he's doing up, he is nuts, he is a total nutjob, but you know what, he is a total nutjob, but you know what, he is a total nutjob, but you know what he's doing, okay.
And by the way, he does, he's doing okay. And by the way, he does, he's doing okay. And by the way, he does get the second biggest audience is get the second biggest audience is get the second biggest audience is nothing like us, nothing like us, nothing like us, not even close. And everybody knows it not even close, and everybody knows it, not even close and everybody knows it.
But here's a difference. So the other - but here's a difference. So the other - but here's a difference. So the other night, they said, ladies and gentlemen, night, they said ladies and gentlemen, night, they said ladies and gentlemen, Donald Trump, here's Donald Trump, I had Donald Trump. Here's Donald Trump.
I had Donald Trump. Here's Donald Trump. I had like a tremendous, I don't know, close to like a tremendous, I don't know, close to like a tremendous, I don't know, close to 20,000 people. And this happens all the 20,000 people. And this happens all the 20,000 people. And this happens all the time time time.
Ladies and gentlemen, Donald Trump is ladies and gentlemen. Donald Trump is ladies and gentlemen. Donald Trump is speaking now and he's just finishing up speaking now and he's just finishing up speaking now and he's just finishing up and bah Papa then when everyone leaves and bah Papa, then when everyone leaves and bah Papa, then when everyone leaves, they usually have somebody Standing they usually have somebody standing, they usually have somebody standing there.
The place is empty. It looks like a there, the place is empty. It looks like a there, the place is empty. It looks like a garbage dump, all this, everything gun and garbage dump, all this, everything gun and garbage dump, all this everything gun and they'll say Donald Trump just spoke and they'll say Donald Trump just spoke and they'll say Donald Trump just spoke and bah, bah, bah And then let's fall fall bah, bah, bah and then let's fall fall bah, bah, bah and then let's fall fall asleep.
Okay? Then they have Bernie asleep. Okay? Then they have Bernie asleep. Okay? Then they have Bernie Sanders. He had 3,000 people. Bernie Sanders, he had 3,000 people. Bernie Sanders, he had 3,000 people. Bernie Sanders had a tremendous crowd tonight. Sanders had a tremendous crowd tonight. Sanders had a tremendous crowd tonight of 3,000 people, unbelievable crowd and of 3,000 people, unbelievable crowd and of 3,000 people, unbelievable crowd.
And I'd have 20 and they don't mention it, I'd have 20 and they don't mention it. I'd have 20 and they don't mention it. Just like when I said to the cameras, just like when I said to the cameras, just like when I said to the cameras turn around and show these people even turn around and show these people even turn around and show these people even during this big game.
In this territory, during this big game in this territory, during this big game in this territory, it's amazing to me. I mean, this is - it's - it's amazing to me. I mean, this is - it's - it's amazing to me. I mean this is - it's incredible but and honestly even coming incredible but and honestly even coming incredible.
But and honestly even coming here, I said to my people are you crazy here, I said to my people, are you crazy here? I said to my people, are you crazy to be having it at that location? It's a to be having it at that location. It's a to be having it at that location. It's a great honor. But look, we have to vote, we great honor.
But look, we have to vote, we great honor, but look, we have to vote. We have to do a mandate. We have to win and have to do a mandate. We have to win and have to do a mandate. We have to win. And one of the biggest reasons we have to do, one of the biggest reasons we have to do, one of the biggest reasons we have to do this for United States Supreme Court, this for United States Supreme Court, this for United States Supreme Court justices I put A - I put a very big - I put a very - I put a - I put a very big, I put a very - I put a - I put a very big, I put a very, very big list of great justices that's very big list of great justices that's very Big list of great justices that's, that's okay.
Will you behave where is he? That's okay, will you behave? Where is he? That's okay, will you behave? Where is he? Where is he? Where is he? Where is he where, where where that's all right, that's all. I'll leave. That's all right. That's all I'll leave. That's all right. That's all. I'll leave her, let her stay, that's all - she's got a her, let her stay, that's all - she's got a her let her stay, that's all.
She's got a little birdie signup. You know, it's given little birdie signup, you know, it's given little birdie signup, you know, it's given to him. Did birdie give it to you himself to him, did birdie give it to you himself to him, did birdie give it to you himself? Sorry, sad actually. No, that's okay.
Let - sorry, sad actually. No, that's okay. Let - sorry, sad actually. No, that's okay. Let her stay. There's no problem. I don't - I - her stay. There's no problem. I don't - I - her stay. There's no problem. I don't - I don't mind. You know, they send them in, don't mind, you know, they send them in.
Don't mind, you know, they send them in with a little birdie sign made in China with a little birdie sign made in China with a little birdie sign made in China. You know, it's a little birdie son, it's a - you know, it's a little birdie son. It's a - you know, it's a little birdie son. It's a pretty sad thing.
I mean unfortunately I pretty sad thing. I mean unfortunately I pretty sad thing. I mean, unfortunately, I was talking about the system, so the was talking about the system. So the was talking about the system. So the Republican system was rigged, Republican system was rigged, Republican system was rigged, but we won by knockouts the birdie.
But we won by knockouts. The birdie, but we won by knockouts. The birdie system is totally rigged. They have system is totally rigged. They have system is totally rigged. They have super-delegates darling. There's no way super-delegates darling. There's no way super-delegates darling. There's no way he could win.
But keep your sign hanging, he could win but keep your sign hanging, he could win but keep your sign hanging high. Okay, high, okay, high, okay. There's no one which is a shame now there's no one which is a shame now there's no one, which is a shame now Bernie and I do agree on one thing. We - Bernie and I do agree on one thing we - Bernie and I do agree on one thing.
We agree that the United States is getting agree that the United States is getting agree that the United States is getting ripped off like crazy on trade. So on ripped off like crazy on trade, so on ripped off like crazy on trade. So on that I agree. That's why I think a lot of that I agree. That's why I think a lot of that I agree.
That's why I think a lot of the people are going to come to me when the people are going to come to me when the people are going to come to me when this is all over the Bernie people are. This is all over the Bernie. People are - this is all over the Bernie people are going to be voting for Trump because going to be voting for Trump because going to be voting for Trump because that's such a big thing.
Our wealth is that's such a big thing. Our wealth is - that's such a big thing. Our wealth is being drained out of us. It's being just being drained out of us. It's being just being drained out of us. It's being just taken like we're a bunch of dopes like taken like we're a bunch of dopes like taken like we're a bunch of dopes like we're a bunch of dopes this year.
We have - we're a bunch of dopes this year. We have - we're a bunch of dopes this year. We have a trade deficit with China of 505, a trade deficit with China of 505, a trade deficit with China of 505 billion dollars. We have a massive trade billion dollars. We have a massive trade billion dollars. We have a massive trade deficit with Vietnam, with Japan, with deficit with Vietnam, with Japan, with deficit with Vietnam, with Japan, with Mexico, you could name any country.
Mexico, you could name any country. Mexico, you could name any country. Virtually any country we deal with. We virtually any country we deal with, we virtually any country we deal with. We have a trade deficit. It used to be the - have a trade deficit. It used to be the - have a trade deficit. It used to be the other way around when we were smart and other way around when we were smart and other way around when we were smart and strong.
But we haven't been smart and strong, but we haven't been smart and strong, but we haven't been smart. And strong for many, many decades and we're strong for many, many decades and we're strong for many, many decades and we're going to change that around folks. We're going to change that around folks. We're going to change that around folks.
We're going to change it around going to change it around going to change it around. We're gonna change it now we have to - we're gonna change it now. We have to - we're gonna change it now. We have to change dinner, oh, we can't keep going change dinner, oh, we can't keep going change dinner. Oh, we can't keep going like this.
We can't - we don't - it's not like this. We can't - we don't - it's not like this. We can't - we don't - it's not like we have a choice, oh, gee, let's go like we have a choice, oh, gee, let's go like we have a choice, oh, gee, let's go like this for another 25 years if we're like this for another 25 years.
If we're like this for another 25 years, if we're gonna save our Social Security and I'm gonna save our Social Security and I'm gonna save our Social Security and I'm the only one that's going to save it, the only one that's going to save It the only one that's going to save it, believe me without cuts.
If we're gonna, believe me without cuts, if we're gonna, believe me without cuts, if we're gonna save our Medicare, if we're gonna save save our Medicare, if we're gonna save save our Medicare, if we're gonna save all of these things that We have to say all of these things that we have to say all of these things that we have to say we have to bring our jobs back and we - we have to bring our jobs back and we - we have to bring our jobs back.
And we have to make sure that nobody's taking - have to make sure that nobody's taking - have to make sure that nobody's taking our jobs anymore, folks. And we're going our jobs anymore, folks and we're going our jobs anymore, folks. And we're going to do that. We're gonna do it. So remember to do that, we're gonna do it.
So remember to do that, we're gonna do it. So remember a couple of things. Hillary Clinton wants a couple of things. Hillary Clinton wants a couple of things. Hillary Clinton wants to abolish the Second Amendment, what's to abolish the Second Amendment, what's to abolish the Second Amendment. What's your policy about the NRA National Rifle Association, last, the NRA National Rifle Association, last, the NRA National Rifle Association, last week endorsed Donald Trump.
I believe it's the earliest endorsement, I believe it's the earliest endorsement. I believe it's the earliest endorsement they've ever given to a presidential they've ever given to a presidential they've ever given to a presidential candidate. And I give that credit to my candidate, and I give that credit to my candidate, and I give that credit to my sons.
They've been members for a long sons. They've been members for a long sons. They've been members for a long time. So if I - but my sons are fantastic time. So if I - but my sons are fantastic time. So if I - but my sons are fantastic and they really - and by the way, I have to - and they really - and by the way, I have to - and they really - and by the way, I have to say this, Wayne and Kris and all of the say this, Wayne and Kris and all of the say, this Wayne and Kris and all of the people, the people that I've met at the people, the people that I've met at, the people, the people that I've met at, the NRA, these are great people, that great NRA, these Are great people that great NRA, these are great people, that great Americans, they love the people of this Americans.
They love the people of this Americans. They love the people of this country. They want the people of this country, they want the people of this country. They want the people of this country to be safe country to be safe country to be safe. These are great people. So I want to - these are great people.
So I want to - these are great people. So I want to thank them for the endorsement. Thank them. For the endorsement, thank them for the endorsement they are so right for this time, okay, so they are so right for this time, okay, so they are so right for this time. Okay. So let me go back for a second. So I said, let me go back for a second.
So I said, let me go back for a second. So I said that Kerry and Nabisco, Ford all these, that Kerry and Nabisco, Ford, all these, that Kerry and Nabisco, Ford, all these cut, they're all leaving. Here's what cut they're all leaving. Here's what cut they're all leaving. Here's what happens. Let's say that a company like happens, let's say that a company like happens, let's say that a company like Kerry announces they're going to leave.
Kerry announces they're going to leave. Kerry announces they're going to leave, I'm going to say very simply and it's - I'm going to say very simply and it's - I'm going to say very simply and it's going to be very, very strong and very going to be very, very strong and very going to be Very, very strong and very, very simple folks, very simple folks, very simple folks.
If you leave, here's the consequence. If you leave, here's the consequence. If you leave, here's the consequence you're going to be taxed at the rate of - you're going to be taxed at the rate of - you're going to be taxed at the rate of 35 percent for every single 35 percent for every single 35 percent for every single air-conditioning Unit that you bring air-conditioning unit that you bring air-conditioning unit that you bring back into our country.
Okay, okay, very back into our country. Okay. Okay, very back into our country. Okay, okay, very simple. Now I've been watching simple now. I've been watching simple now. I've been watching politicians in Washington for seven politicians in Washington for seven politicians in Washington for seven years, trying to figure out how to stop years, trying to figure out how to stop years, trying to figure out how to stop companies from leaving.
They're all companies from leaving. They're all companies from leaving. They're all leaving. You know, I shouldn't do it leaving, you know, I shouldn't do it leaving. You know, I shouldn't do it because I'll ruin you tonight. But I have because I'll ruin you tonight. But I have - because I'll ruin you tonight, but I have stats on San Jose, not good, not good stats.
On San Jose, not good, not good stats. On San Jose, not good, not good. You're losing your manufacturing, you're losing your manufacturing, you're losing your manufacturing one-in-three manufacturing jobs laws, one-in-three manufacturing, jobs laws, one-in-three manufacturing jobs laws, Hillary ran up a one trillion dollar, Hillary ran up a one trillion dollar.
Hillary ran up a one trillion dollar trade deficit with China. While she was trade deficit with China, while she was trade deficit with China, while she was Secretary of State so many different Secretary of State so many different Secretary of State. So many different things since Clinton, Bill Clinton signed things since Clinton, Bill Clinton signed things since Clinton, Bill Clinton signed NAFTA probably the worst economic deal.
NAFTA probably the worst economic deal. NAFTA probably the worst economic deal we've ever made in this country we've ever made in this country we've ever made in this country. Since then, California has lost one in since then. California has lost one in since then. California has lost one in four of its manufacturing jobs.
I mean I - four of its manufacturing jobs, I mean I - four of its manufacturing jobs, I mean I could go on except its statistics, folks could go on except its statistics. Folks could go on except its statistics. Folks done by my statistician, he thinks it's done by my statistician. He thinks it's done by my statistician.
He thinks it's the most exciting job in the world. I - the most exciting job in the world, I - the most exciting job in the world. I don't want to depress you, okay, but it's don't want to depress you, okay, but it's don't want to depress you, okay, but it's just terrible, just terrible, just terrible.
NAFTA was signed by Bill Clinton. It's NAFTA was signed by Bill Clinton. It's NAFTA was signed by Bill Clinton. It's probably the worst economic deal made by probably the worst economic deal made by probably the worst economic deal made by our country maybe ever you look at New our country maybe ever you look at New our country maybe ever you look at New England, you look At upstate New York, you, England, you look at upstate New York, you England, you look at upstate New York, you look at way out on the island in New look at way out on the island in New look at way out on the island in New York.
The places have been wiped out York, the places have been wiped out York, the places have been wiped out. Pennsylvania, I love Pennsylvania, we're Pennsylvania, I love Pennsylvania, we're Pennsylvania, I love Pennsylvania. We're gonna win Pennsylvania by the way. We won gonna win Pennsylvania by the way we won gonna win Pennsylvania by the way we won all of these, you know, in the primaries.
All of these, you know, in the primaries, all of these, you know, in the primaries, they said, well, we'll stop him, right? They said, well, we'll stop him, right? They said, well, we'll stop him right after New York. So we had Pennsylvania after New York. So we had Pennsylvania after New York, so we had Pennsylvania landslide.
We had Maryland, landslide rid landslide. We had Maryland, landslide rid landslide. We had Maryland, landslide rid, Connecticut; landslide, Connecticut; landslide, Connecticut; landslide, we had Rhode Island and Delaware. We had Rhode Island and Delaware. We had Rhode Island and Delaware landslide, then they came to Indiana, that landslide, then they came to Indiana, that landslide, then they came to Indiana, that was going to be the firewall.
Remember was going to be the firewall. Remember was going to be the firewall. Remember, Indiana, Bobby Knight, Bobby Knight, Bobby Indiana, Bobby Knight, Bobby Knight, Bobby Indiana, Bobby Knight, Bobby Knight Bobby nine hundred wins and Bobby said I want nine hundred wins and Bobby said I want nine hundred wins and Bobby said I want to endorse you man to endorse You man to endorse you, man.
I want to endorse you. You're the guy. I want to endorse you. You're the guy. I want to endorse you. You're the guy that can turn this country around and that can turn this country around and that can turn this country around. And Bobby Knight walked into an arena. We had Bobby Knight walked into an arena.
We had Bobby Knight walked into an arena. We had 20,000 people and they gave him a hand 20,000 people and they gave him a hand 20,000 people and they gave him a hand for five minutes. I said, you know this is for five minutes I said, you know this is for five minutes. I said, you know this is one of the few endorsements I think is one of the few endorsements I think is one of the few endorsements I think is going to work out very nicely.
And I won going to work out very nicely and I won going to work out very nicely. And I won the state of Indiana in a landslide: the - the state of Indiana in a landslide, the - the state of Indiana in a landslide, the landslide, landslide landslide. And I think - and I'm not even talking and I think - and I'm not even talking and I think - and I'm not even talking about landslides, but I think we can win about landslides.
But I think we can win about landslides. But I think we can win the state of California and win it the state of California and win it the state of California and win it pretty substantial. Now I've been told by pretty substantial now I've been told by pretty substantial. Now I've been told by all these geniuses, you know, all these, all these geniuses, you know, all these, all these geniuses, you know, all these brilliant guys, they all say you can't brilliant guys.
They all say you can't brilliant guys. They all say you can't win the state of California. I think we win the state of California. I think we win the state of California. I think we can look at a crowd. I mean look at this can look at a crowd. I mean look at this can look at a crowd, I mean look at this crowd during that during the Warriors crowd during that - during the Warriors crowd during that during the Warriors game, look at this, this is crazy during game.
Look at this - this is crazy during game, look at this, this is crazy during the big basketball game. In fact, I'm the big basketball game. In fact, I'm the big basketball game. In fact, I'm thinking about leaving and watching it, thinking about leaving and watching it, thinking about leaving and watching it myself, myself, myself.
Bye everybody now. I mean during the game. Bye everybody now. I mean during the game, bye everybody now. I mean during the game. So here's the story, here's the story I - so here's the story. Here's the story I - so here's the story. Here's the story. I think we're gonna run hard in California. Think we're gonna run hard in California.
Think we're gonna run hard in California. And I'm gonna run hard in New York and I'm gonna run hard in New York and I'm gonna run hard in New York. These are two states that no other - these are two states that no other - these are two states that no other Republican candidate would ever even try Republican candidate would ever even try Republican candidate would ever even try to run right.
But I'm gonna run hard in to run right, but I'm gonna run hard in to run, right. But I'm gonna run hard in California. You got ta be with me. I think California, you got ta be with me. I think California, you got ta be with me, I think we can win California and if we win California, the election is - and if we win California, the election is - and if we win California, the election is over folks, it's over.
We win and then we over folks it's over, we win and then we over folks it's over, we win and then we will make America great. Again, believe me will make America great again, believe me will make America great again. Believe me, it's over now. With that being said, it's over now with that being said, it's over now.
With that being said, Hilary has raised a billion dollars and Hilary has raised a billion dollars and Hilary has raised a billion dollars and plans to raise more than a billion plans to raise more than a billion plans to raise more than a billion dollars. And she will do negative ads, all dollars and she will do negative ads, all dollars and she will do negative ads all over the place.
Now here's the good news over the place. Now here's the good news over the place. Now here's the good news. When I won Florida in a landslide, won it when I won Florida in a landslide, won it when I won Florida in a landslide, won it in a massive landslide. I had more in a massive landslide. I had more in a massive landslide.
I had more negative ads. In fact, I went to my people negative ads. In fact, I went to my people negative ads. In fact, I went to my people, I called up Ivanka. Did anyone ever hear? I called up Ivanka, did anyone ever hear? I called up Ivanka. Did anyone ever hear of Ivanka described? I called up my wife of Ivanka described, I called up my wife of Ivanka described, I called up my wife, Melania.
I said I got a problem. There are Melania. I said I got a problem. There are Melania I said I got a problem. There are so many negative ads. It's impossible so many negative ads. It's impossible. So many negative ads. It's impossible. There's no way I can win. And then I - there's no way I can win. And then I - there's no way I can win.
And then I ended up winning 66 out of 67 counties, ended up winning 66 out of 67 counties, ended up winning 66 out of 67 counties. That has never been done before and one that has never been done before and one that has never been done before and one in a massive landslide, Florida and I in a massive landslide, Florida and I in a massive landslide.
Florida and I said do ads work anymore, it's like so said, do ads work anymore. It's like so said, do ads work anymore. It's like - so Hillary has earmarked over a hundred. Hillary has earmarked over a hundred. Hillary has earmarked over a hundred million dollars early on for negative million dollars early on for negative million dollars early on for negative ads against Donald Trump and believe me ads against Donald Trump and believe me ads against Donald Trump and believe me folks, they're false ads.
They are so folks, they're false ads, they are so folks, they're false ads, they are so false as some of them aren't that false false as some of them aren't that false false as some of them aren't that false actually mostly you know, it's a problem actually Mostly, you know, it's a problem actually mostly you know it's a problem when you do as much as I've done I've when you do as much as I've done I've when you do as much as I've done, I've done so many deals.
I built a great done. So many deals I built a great done so many deals. I built a great company. I filed my papers with the company. I filed my papers with the company, I filed my papers with the election group and you know, when you election group and you know when you election group and you know when you look at that, look at that, look at that, I mean you look at those Papers believe, I mean you look at those papers believe, I mean you look at those papers, believe me, they - I built a great, great company, me.
They - I built a great, great company, me. They - I built a great, great company. Nobody likes to look, hey, believe me, if nobody likes to look, hey, believe me, if nobody likes to look, hey, believe me, if it wasn't, you'd be reading about it and it wasn't, you'd be reading about it and it wasn't, you'd be reading about it.
And with nobody wants to talk about, it was with nobody wants to talk about, it was with nobody wants to talk about it was like a feeding frenzy. Like a feeding frenzy like a feeding frenzy, I built the company that's worth more. I built the company that's worth more. I built the company that's worth more than 10 billion dollars.
I started off than 10 billion dollars. I started off than 10 billion dollars. I started off with a million dollar loan, I always hear with a million dollar loan, I always hear with a million dollar loan. I always hear how I started off with a two hundred, how I started off with a two hundred, how I started off with a two hundred million dollar gift and my sister called million dollar gift and my sister called million dollar gift and my sister called me, She said really how did that happen me, she said really how did that happen me, she said really how did that happen?
Two hundred believe me, so you are gonna, two hundred believe me. So you are gonna, two hundred believe me. So you are gonna see something that's going to be so see something that's going to be so see something that's going to be so spectacular with what we do here. Spectacular with what we do here, spectacular with what we do here.
I built a great company and you know I built a great company and you know I built a great company and you know what, in many ways this is going to be what in many ways this is going to be what in many ways this is going To be easier, this is going to be easier, easier. This is going to be easier, easier.
This is going to be easier because we have such unbelievable because we have such unbelievable because we have such unbelievable momentum going here with what we're momentum going here with what we're momentum going here with what we're doing. We are going to do things that doing. We are going to do things that doing, we are going to do things that nobody's never seen before.
Nobody's never seen before. Nobody's never seen before. We've already done that when they are. We've already done that when they are. We've already done that when they are saying Bill O'Reilly in his life. He said saying Bill O'Reilly in his life, he said saying Bill O'Reilly in his life, he said this is the single greatest political.
This is the single greatest political. This is the single greatest political phenomena he's ever witnessed, pretty phenomena he's ever witnessed, pretty phenomena he's ever witnessed, pretty good. It's pretty good. We are going to do good. It's pretty good. We are going to do good. It's pretty good. We are going to do things that you've never seen before and things that you've never seen before and things that you've never seen before and we're gonna get along great with these we're gonna get along great with these we're gonna get along great.
With these countries, you know, I watched Hilary's countries, you know, I watched Hilary's countries, you know I watched Hilary's thing today which was hard. It was like thing today which was hard. It was like thing today which was hard. It was like it's like taking sominex. It's like taking sominex, it's like taking sominex to watch her as like Stallman X, Y Fe to watch her as like Stallman X, Y Fe to watch her as like Stallman X, Y Fe, eres dominant sleep all night being it's eres dominant sleep all night being it's Eres dominant sleep all night being - it's hard to stay awake when you know I'm not hard to stay awake when you know, I'm not hard to stay awake when you know I'm not a big sleeper.
I think she could make a big sleeper. I think she could make a big sleeper. I think she could make more money if she made speeches and sold more money if she made speeches and sold more money. If she made speeches and sold them for people that can't sleep, it was them for people that can't sleep, it was them for people that can't sleep, it was hard.
But she lies so much. She said hard, but she lies so much. She said hard, but she lies so much. She said Donald Trump wants Japan to put in. Donald Trump wants Japan to put in. Donald Trump wants Japan to put in nuclear weapons. No, no, no nuclear weapons, no, no, no nuclear weapons, no, no, no! Sawadee in a deal you'll always have to Sawadee in a deal, you'll always have to Sawadee in a deal.
You'll always have to be prepared to walk. We have a lot of - be prepared to walk. We have a lot of - be prepared to walk. We have a lot of business people, we have four or five of business people. We have four or five of business people. We have four or five of them that I know that a friends of mine them that I know that a friends of mine them that I know that a friends of mine, you know, I own a big chunk of the Bank.
You know, I own a big chunk of the Bank, you know I own a big chunk of the Bank of America building, right. So I want you of America building, right. So I want you of America building, right. So I want you to make San Francisco good, but I own a - to make San Francisco good, but I own a - to make San Francisco good.
But I own a big, big chunk of that building and I big, big chunk of that building and I big, big chunk of that building. And I will tell you in a deal you have to be - will tell you in a deal you have to be - will tell you in a deal you have to be prepared to walk, oh, you can't go into a prepared to walk, oh, you can't go into A prepared to walk, oh, you can't go into a deal and say, I'm not walking now crooked deal and say, I'm not walking now crooked deal and say, I'm not walking now crooked.
Hillary said we will always stand by our Hillary said. We will always stand by our Hillary said we will always stand by our partners. We will never leave, we will partners, we will never leave, we will partners. We will never leave. We will stand by our partners. We never ever will stand by our partners.
We never ever will stand by our partners we never ever will leave. These are great allies, she said leave, these are great allies, she said leave, these are great allies, she said China is jealous of us and she said who China is jealous of us. And she said who China is jealous of us. And she said who else is, Jo?
She said, Oh, China and Russia else is, Jo, she said, Oh, China and Russia else is, Jo, she said, Oh, China and Russia are jealous of our relationships, did not. Are jealous of our relationships did not, are jealous of our relationships did not jealous. They think we're stupid. We give jealous. They think we're stupid.
We give jealous. They think we're stupid. We give them pre defense, they think we're stupid them pre defense, they think we're stupid them pre defense, they think we're stupid. She's saying that China and Russia are - she's saying that China and Russia are - she's saying that China and Russia are essentially envious or jealous of a essentially envious or jealous of a essentially envious or jealous of a partnership with all of these people partnership with all of These people partnership with all of these people that are taking our money.
So here's a - that are taking our money. So here's a - that are taking our money. So here's a story. Here's what I say. Remember this story: here's what I say. Remember this story, here's what I say, remember this and I have to tell you the New York and I have to tell you the New York and I have to tell you the New York Times is a terrible newspaper, is failing Times is a terrible newspaper, is Failing Times is a terrible newspaper is failing but David Sanger, very good writer, did a - but David Sanger, very good writer, did a - but David Sanger, very good writer did a very accurate story.
The Washington Post very accurate story. The Washington Post very accurate story. The Washington Post is a totally dishonest newspaper, totally is a totally dishonest newspaper, totally is a totally dishonest newspaper. Totally I'd be - they are the worst, but the New I'd be - they are the worst, but the New I'd be - they are the worst, but the New York Times pretty bad.
Hey, how about the York Times pretty bad? Hey, how about the York Times pretty bad? Hey, how about the story? They did a week ago about Donald story. They did a week ago about Donald story. They did a week ago about Donald Trump and women and then all the women Trump and women and then all the women Trump and women.
And then all the women came back and they said that's not true, came back and they said that's not true, came back and they said that's not true. We love Donald Trump, right, right? This story was a fraud. In fact, I saw the - this story was a fraud. In fact, I saw the - this story was a fraud. In fact, I saw the women I said, oh, that's great news for me.
Women, I said, oh, that's great news for me. Women, I said, oh, that's great news for me. They're gonna say good and then I read they're gonna say good. And then I read they're gonna say good. And then I read this stuff. I said, man, I can't believe this stuff. I said, man, I can't believe this stuff. I said man, I can't believe that she would say it or she would say that she would say it or she would say that she would say it or she would say it.
So you had Carrie Prejean and she it. So you had Carrie Prejean and she it. So you had Carrie Prejean and she said no way I didn't say. That said no way I didn't say. That said no way. I didn't say that and you had Roane and she said there's - and you had Roane and she said there's - and you had Roane and she said there's no way I've great respect for Donald.
No way I've great respect for Donald. No way I've great respect for Donald Trump, he treated me great. He was a great Trump. He treated me great. He was a great Trump. He treated me great. He was a great guy. You had all these women, you had one guy, you had all these women, you had one guy, you had all these women, you had one woman said, I told her not to eat that woman said, I told her not to eat that woman said, I told her Not to eat that piece of candy, this is my - I mean I had a piece of candy, this is my - I mean I had a piece of candy, this is my - I mean I had a lot of friends called me up and they say lot of friends Called me up and they say lot of friends called me up and they say we're really disappointed in you man.
We're really disappointed in you man. We're really disappointed in you man, tell you what, and this was a woman, okay, tell you what - and this was a woman, okay, tell you what - and this was a woman, okay, like 25 years ago, I put her in charge of like 25 years ago, I put Her in charge of like 25 years ago, I put her in charge of construction of a building, she was fine construction of a building.
She was fine construction of a building. She was fine, okay? Then she went to another companies, okay? Then she went to another companies. Okay, then she went to another companies you want to come back, she begged me to you, want to come back. She begged me to you, want to come back. She begged me to come back, but I gave her a job come back, but I gave her a job come back, but I gave her a job.
Remember her name was rest. I gave her a, remember her name was rest. I gave her a remember her name was rest. I gave her a job that no other woman had ever been in job that no other woman had ever been in job that no other woman had ever been in charge of building a massive skyscraper charge of building a massive skyscraper charge of building a massive skyscraper.
In New York, no Trump Tower, I gave her in New York, no Trump Tower, I gave her in New York. No Trump Tower, I gave her the job. She went to another company. So the job, she went to another company. So the job, she went to another company, so it probably got to $ 2 more only because it probably got to $ 2 more only because it probably got to $ 2 more only because she worked for me, she got $ 2 more then she worked for Me she got $ 2 more, then she worked for me.
She got $ 2 more then all of a sudden that didn't work out for all of a sudden that didn't work out for all of a sudden that didn't work out for many years. She's been writing me letters many years. She's been writing me letters many years. She's been writing me letters saying you the greatest. You're the saying you the greatest, you're the saying you the greatest, you're the greatest.
I'd love to come back to work greatest. I'd love to come back to work greatest. I'd love to come back to work for you for you for you. You're the greatest. She even wrote me, you're the greatest. She even wrote me, you're the greatest. She even wrote me one letter saying that I'm not sexist. I one letter saying that I'm not sexist I one letter saying that I'm not sexist.
I said. What the hell does that have to do said, what the hell does that have to do said, what the hell does that have to do? She'll be a letter or an email, she'll be a letter or an email, she'll be a letter or an email. I love emails, you can't erase emails, you, I love emails, you can't erase emails, you, I love emails, you can't erase emails, you can't erase them.
I love them because I can't erase them. I love them because I can't erase them. I love them. Because I said to Rona, my executive assistant, Rona said to Rona, my executive assistant, Rona said to Rona, my executive assistant, Rona didn't this bobner write me emails. Didn't this bobner write me emails, didn't this bobner write me emails wanting to come back?
Well, I'll find out wanting to come back. Well, I'll find out wanting to come back. Well, I'll find out she comes back two minutes later. She's she comes back two minutes later. She's she comes back two minutes later. She's got a whole pile of email by the way, got a whole pile of email by the way got a whole pile of email.
By the way, Hillary Clinton is missing 30,000 emails. Hillary Clinton is missing 30,000 emails. Hillary Clinton is missing 30,000 emails. They've been deleted 30,000, 30,000, they've been deleted 30,000, 30,000. They've been deleted 30,000, 30,000 emails. And remember I said I was a emails and remember I said I was a emails and remember I said I was a counter-puncher I am after.
What she said counter-puncher, I am after what she said counter-puncher, I am after what she said about me today and our phony speech that about me today and our phony speech that about me today and our phony speech that was a phony speech that was a Donald Was a phony speech that was a - Donald was a phony speech that was a Donald Trump picture.
I will say this. Hillary Trump picture. I will say this. Hillary Trump picture. I will say this. Hillary Clinton has to go to jail, okay? Just to Clinton has to go to jail, okay, just to Clinton has to go to jail. Okay. Just to go to chill, go to chill, go to chill. Yesterday I was a phony hit you, she's yesterday, I was a phony hit you, she's yesterday.
I was a phony hit you. She's guilty as hell. So this woman guilty as hell. So this woman guilty as hell. So this woman - so Barbara res is praising me that. So Barbara res is praising me that. So Barbara res is praising me that Donald Trump is great. Mr. Trump, I'd love Donald. Trump is great. Mr. Trump, I'd love Donald.
Trump is great. Mr. Trump, I'd love to have a job, could I go use a hotel all to have a job? Could I go use a hotel, all to have a job? Could I go use a hotel, all this stuff? And then she writes the this stuff and then she writes the this stuff and then she writes the letter that I'm not sexist, okay?
I never letter that. I'm not sexist, okay? I never letter that. I'm not sexist, okay? I never had anybody by the way, anybody that had anybody, by the way, anybody that had anybody, by the way, anybody that writes the letter without the words writes the letter without the words writes the letter without the words being mentioned that you're really good being mentioned That you're really good being mentioned that you're really good and you're not sexist anybody puts that and you're not sexist anybody puts that and you're not sexist anybody puts that in the letter that you know their in the letter that you know their in the letter that You know their trouble, okay, don't hire that person trouble, okay, don't hire that person trouble, okay, don't hire that person because you know their trouble because because you know their trouble because because you know their trouble because that means it's right on their mind does that means It's right on their mind, does that means it's right on their mind.
Does that make sense? Anybody out of nowhere that make sense, anybody out of nowhere that make sense anybody out of nowhere. So this terrible person, I gave her a job. So this terrible person I gave her a job. So this terrible person I gave her a job, the opportunity of a lifetime, the opportunity of a lifetime, the opportunity of a lifetime.
She took the job, I got it completed, she, she took the job. I got it completed she, she took the job, I got it completed, she was gone, wanted to come back. I didn't was gone, wanted to come back. I didn't was gone, wanted to come back. I didn't take her. Remember this now she writes a take her. Remember this now she writes a take her, remember this now she writes a book and the book is great about me said book and the book is great about me said book and the book is great about me said great things about me.
That was four or great things about me. That was four or great things about me. That was four or five years ago, all of a sudden, I see five years ago, all of a sudden, I see five years ago, all of a sudden, I see these sleaze bags. This guy named Bob, these sleaze bags, this guy named Bob. These sleaze bags, this guy named Bob Barrow, is an absolute sleaze bag.
Barrow is an absolute sleaze bag. Barrow is an absolute sleaze bag, terrible writer. He's a terrible writer, terrible writer. He's a terrible writer, terrible writer. He's a terrible writer. He wrote this, he wrote this, he wrote this story on the women and he was very story on the women and he was very story on the women and he was very embarrassed and they should do a embarrassed and they should do a embarrassed and they should Do a retraction of the story or an apology if retraction of the story or an apology, if retraction of the story or an apology, if they were real people, they would do an - they were real people, they would do an - they were real people.
They would do an apology, but the other woman that was apology, but the other woman that was apology, but the other woman that was - that didn't apologize was this woman. So that didn't apologize was this woman. So that didn't apologize was this woman. So I gave this woman the break of a - I gave this woman, the break of a - I gave this woman, the break of a lifetime, you talk about breaking the lifetime, you talk about breaking the lifetime, you talk about breaking the glass ceiling and she comes out And she glass ceiling and she comes out and she glass ceiling and she comes out and she said bad things.
Now about the worst said bad things. Now about the worst said bad things. Now about the worst thing she said was that I then I told thing she said was that I then I told thing she said was that I then I told her not to have a piece of candy, okay, her not to have a piece of candy, okay? Her not to have a piece of candy, okay, but can you imagine so, but they never, but can you imagine so, but they never, but can you imagine so, but they never called me once to ask about these people called me once to ask about these people Called me once to ask about these people because if they did, I would have given because if they did, I would have given because if they did, I would have given her 20 emails and they wouldn't have her 20 emails and they wouldn't have her 20 emails.
And they wouldn't have been able to write the story, but they been able to write the story, but they been able to write the story. But they don't do that because these newspapers don't do that because these newspapers don't do that because these newspapers and the media are totally dishonest and the media are totally dishonest and the media are totally dishonest people.
Folks remember them totally people, folks remember them totally people folks remember them totally dishonest. How about this when I was dishonest, how about this when I was dishonest, how about this? When I was making a speech in Iowa, I said, let's making a speech in Iowa. I said, let's making a speech in Iowa, I said let's raise the money for the mess, right?
I raise the money for the mess, right? I raise the money for the mess, right? I raise - think of this, let's raise some raise. Think of this, let's raise some raise, think of this, let's raise some money from them, money from them, money from them. I raised - I started saying, you know, I raised - I started saying, you know I raised - I started saying you know, before the event, I figured maybe we can before the event.
I figured maybe we can. Before the event. I figured maybe we can raise a half a million or a million, what raise a half a million or a million, what raise a half a million or a million. What do men? I don't know that all of a sudden do men. I don't know that all of a sudden do men. I don't know that all of a sudden a lot of guys.
Thank you man ID for your a lot of guys. Thank you man ID for your a lot of guys. Thank you man. ID for your vet. Thank you. You know what I'm gonna vet. Thank you. You know what I'm gonna vet. Thank you. You know what I'm gonna say, right. Thank you. Great people and say right. Thank you. Great people and say right, thank you.
Great people and we're gonna take care of the vets, we're gonna take care of the vets, we're gonna take care of the vets, believe me, we're gonna take care of, believe me, we're gonna take care of, believe me, we're gonna take Care of their medical, we're gonna take care of. So I said let's raise the money.
I got no. So I said let's raise the money. I got no. So I said let's raise the money. I got no obligation. I was supposed to make a obligation. I was supposed to make a obligation. I was supposed to make a speech like this in Iowa, so I start the speech like this in Iowa. So I start the speech like this in Iowa.
So I start the speech and during the speech somewhere I speech and during the speech somewhere I speech and during the speech somewhere I said let's raise some money for the vets said let's raise some money for the vets said let's raise some money for the vets. A friend of mine was there. Phil ruff and a friend of mine was there.
Phil ruff and a friend of mine was there. Phil ruff and he gave a million dollars, another friend. He gave a million dollars, another friend. He gave a million dollars, another friend. Ike Perlmutter gave a million dollars. Ike Perlmutter gave a million dollars. Ike Perlmutter gave a million dollars. Great guy, another guy, Carl Icahn, great, great guy.
Another guy, Carl Icahn, great, great guy. Another guy, Carl Icahn, great guy gave a half a million though Stewart guy gave a half a million though Stewart guy gave a half a million though Stewart raw gave a million notes. I said wow, raw gave a million notes. I said, wow, raw gave a million notes, I said, wow, we're doing well.
And during the course I - we're doing well and during the course I - we're doing well and during the course I said let's - if we can do 3 million, 4 said let's - if we can do 3 million, 4 said let's - if we can do 3 million, 4 million, 5 million to 6 million, it million, 5 million to 6 million, it million, 5 million to 6 million.
It doesn't matter whatever they held a doesn't matter whatever they held a doesn't matter whatever they held a number and a lot of money came in with number. And a lot of money came in with number and a lot of money came in with distributors, distributed distributors, distributed distributors distributed all of a sudden, I'm getting the worst all of a sudden, I'm getting the worst all of a sudden, I'm getting the worst publicity of My life - so here's the final publicity of my life.
So here's the final publicity of my life. So here's the final number, but the number could go up number, but the number could go up number. But the number could go up because there's more coming in because - because there's more coming in because - because there's more coming in because we have to vet a lot of these places you - we have to vet a lot of these places you - we have to vet a Lot of these places, you know, you can't send them a check for know you can't send them a check for know you can't send them a check for 200,000. You don't even know that you're 200,000, you don't even know that you're 200,000, you don't even know that you're sending it to.
So you watched my press sending it to. So you watched my press sending it to. So you watched my press conference the other day. So the conference the other day, so the conference the other day, so the Washington Post, which is just a ploy for Washington Post, which is just a ploy for Washington Post, which is just a ploy for Amazon so that Amazon doesn't pay taxes Amazon.
So that Amazon doesn't pay taxes Amazon so that Amazon doesn't pay taxes so that Amazon doesn't get accused of. So that Amazon doesn't get accused of. So that Amazon doesn't get accused of monopolistic practices because frankly monopolistic practices because frankly monopolistic practices because frankly they're putting all the retailers at a, they're putting all the retailers at a, they're putting all the retailers at a business, ok, you want to know the truth business.
Ok, you want to know the truth business, ok, you want to know the truth and the politicians are afraid of them and the politicians are afraid of them and the politicians are afraid of them because the guy bought the Washington because the guy bought the Washington because The guy bought the Washington Post, but is the story so they start Post but is the story.
So they start Post but is the story. So they start doing stories like how much did he give doing stories, like how much did he give doing stories? Like how much did he give, how much - where's the money, how much, where's the money, how much, where's the money, when's it going to be delivered? I said I when's it going to be delivered.
I said I when's it going to be delivered. I said I don't care whatever it is it is. I wrote, don't care whatever it is. It is. I wrote, don't care whatever it is it is. I wrote a check for 1 million by the way 1 a check for 1 million by the way 1 a check for 1 million by the way 1 million and - and I sent it and I was million and - and I sent it and I was million.
And and I sent it and I was going to give it to four or five going to give it to four or five going to give it to four or five companies. We couldn't vet them. I just companies we couldn't vet them. I just companies we couldn't vet them, I just said it's too complicated. So I gave it said it's too complicated.
So I gave it said it's too complicated. So I gave it to one company, but if that's great one to one company, but if that's great one to one company, but if that's great one group the - we gave it to just a great group. The - we gave it to just a great group. The - we gave it to just a great group. The Marines, the Marines, great group, the Marines, the Marines, great group, the Marines, the Marines great a marine Facebook, so listen to them.
So a marine Facebook, so listen to them. So a marine Facebook, so listen to them. So here's the end, I raised almost six, here's the end, I raised almost six. Here's the end, I raised almost six million dollars, 5.6 million has been million dollars, 5.6 million has been million dollars, 5.6 million has been distributed.
I give you know, it's not distributed. I give you know, it's not distributed, I give you know, it's not easy. I had a lot of people working on it easy. I had a lot of people working on it easy. I had a lot of people working on it, a lot of work and you're raising it and a lot of work and you're raising it and a lot of work and you're raising it and you're giving - and you're doing a lot of you're giving and you're doing A lot of you're giving and you're doing a lot of things and you're calling in favors from things and you're calling in favors from things and you're calling in favors from friends.
Frankly, they give you money for friends. Frankly, they give you money for friends. Frankly, they give you money for other things if you wanted to do it. So I other things if you wanted to do it. So I other things if you wanted to do it. So I raised almost six million dollars, raised almost six million dollars, raised almost six million dollars.
Remember this for the veterans, which we remember this for the veterans, which we remember this for the veterans which we love. I got nothing but bad, publicity love I got nothing but bad. Publicity love I got nothing but bad publicity. I got nothing but bad publicity and then I got nothing but bad publicity and then I got nothing but bad publicity.
And then a group forms outside a small group like a group forms outside a small group like a group forms outside a small group like a few people, ten people and their a few people, ten people and their a few people, ten people and their veterans against Trump and I said how veterans against Trump and I said how veterans against Trump and I said how can they be against me?
I raise all this, can they be against me? I raise all this, can they be against me? I raise all this money. It turns out they were sent there money. It turns out they were sent there money. It turns out they were sent there by Hillary Clinton. It's honestly folks, it's a disgrace. So it's honestly folks, it's a disgrace.
So it's honestly folks, it's a disgrace. So I'm so proud of it. Here's the goodness. I'm so proud of it. Here's the goodness. I'm so proud of it. Here's the goodness. Here's the goodness what the good news. I - here's the goodness what the good news. I - here's the goodness what the good news I have received so many tweets and emails have received so many tweets and emails have received so many tweets and emails and phone calls and everything, letters and phone calls and everything, letters and phone calls and everything letters from The incredible veterans thanking me from the incredible veterans thanking me from the incredible veterans thanking me for what I did cuz they get it together for what I did cuz they get it together for what I did cuz they get it together and I didn't have to Do it - I didn't have and I didn't have to do it, I didn't have and I didn't have to do it.
I didn't have to do it. But you know the bad part of to do it. But you know the bad part of to do it. But you know the bad part of that story, I'm so glad I did it anyway that story, I'm so glad I did it anyway, that story, I'm so glad I did it anyway. And most people understand heroes one and most people understand heroes one and most people understand heroes one guy said, wait a minute, guy said, wait a minute, guy said wait a minute, he raised all this money.
What did he do? He raised all this money. What did he do? He raised all this money, what did he do wrong? And I gave it to great groups wrong and I gave it to great groups wrong and I gave it to great groups. Actually one group said, I think like actually one group said, I think like actually one group said, I think like 30-some odd groups, many, many groups, one 30-some odd groups, many, many groups, one 30-some odd groups, many, many groups, one group said one of the group's.
He gave group said one of the group's he gave group said one of the group's he gave money to was not great. He said, I sorry, money to was not great. He said, I sorry, money to was not great. He said, I sorry, folks, folks, folks, unbelievable headline. So look, here's the unbelievable headline. So look, here's the unbelievable headline.
So look, here's the story and the bad part, other people like story and the bad part, other people like story and the bad part. Other people like me will see what happened to me where I me will see what happened to me, where I me will see what happened to me where I got nothing but bad publicity and got nothing but bad publicity and got nothing but bad publicity.
And they're gonna say, I'm never gonna do, they're gonna say, I'm never gonna do, they're gonna say I'm never gonna do that. Again, I'm never gonna do it. So you that. Again, I'm never gonna do it. So you that again, I'm never gonna do it, so you have guys that would be inclined to do have guys that would be inclined to do have guys that would be inclined to do it.
And they're already saying this, rich, it - and they're already saying this, rich, it and they're already saying this, rich guys to call me saying, man, you shouldn't guys to call me saying, man, you shouldn't guys to call me saying, man, you shouldn't have done it. I was under - no obligation have done it.
I was under - no obligation have done it. I was under no obligation whatsoever to do it. I just said, let's whatsoever to do it. I just said, let's whatsoever to do it. I just said, let's see if we can raise the money for the - see if we can raise the money for the - see if we can raise the money for the vets.
That's how it started. We raised vets, that's how it started. We raised vets. That's how it started. We raised much more than I ever thought possible, much more than I ever thought possible, much more than I ever thought possible and I got nothing but hits from the New and I got nothing but hits from the New and I got nothing.
But hits from the New York Times and the dirty Washington Post York Times and the dirty Washington Post York Times and the dirty Washington Post, which is a nod. It is a disgusting which is a nod. It is a disgusting which is a nod. It is a disgusting newspaper, you know they have visual newspaper, you know they have visual newspaper.
You know they have visual Amazon money. They have 22 reporters in Amazon money. They have 22 reporters in Amazon money. They have 22 reporters in me doing stories 22. I get calls every me doing stories 22, I get calls every me doing stories 22, I get calls every hour hope. Did anyone ever hear of Hope?
X hour hope? Did anyone ever hear of Hope? X hour hope? Did anyone ever hear of? Hope? X wears open? Hope she gets calls, every wears open, hope she gets calls, every wears open, hope she gets calls every half hour hour. This is the Washington half hour hour. This is the Washington half hour hour. This is the Washington Post.
We're doing a story on a deal. Mr. Post, we're doing a story on a deal mr. Post. We're doing a story on a deal mr. Trump did in 1973. I said man that's a Trump did in 1973. I said man that's a Trump did in 1973. I said man, that's a long time. You know, I have a good memory long time. You know I have a good memory long time.
You know I have a good memory that's a long time ago. They want to do that's a long time ago. They want to do that's a long time ago. They want to do anything they are discussing now they. Anything they are discussing now, they anything they are discussing now, they say they're doing a book, you know what say they're doing a book, you know what say they're doing a book, you know what they're doing.
They're taking all of the - they're doing, they're taking all of the - they're doing, they're taking all of the bad stores and they're just putting it bad stores and they're just putting it bad stores and they're just putting it in sealing. It put, doing a book. These are in sealing, it put doing a book, these are in sealing, it put, doing a book.
These are dishonest people, folks. Let me tell you dishonest people, folks, let me tell you dishonest people, folks, let me tell you, but but - but we're not finished because see, I don't - we're not finished because see, I don't - we're not finished because see, I don't care other guys wouldn't say this a Care, other guys wouldn't say this a care.
Other guys wouldn't say this a politician, wouldn't say this. They'd say politician wouldn't say this. They'd say politician wouldn't say this, they'd say, oh, oh! To Washington. I don't care, I - oh, oh to Washington. I don't care, I - oh oh to Washington, I don't care, I couldn't care less because the people couldn't care less because the people couldn't care less because the people understand.
So for the vets, I am very understand. So for the vets, I am very understand. So for the vets, I am very happy, I raised that money for you. Vets happy. I raised that money for you. Vets happy. I raised that money for you. Vets. I'm very happy even though it got me a - I'm very happy even though it got me a - I'm very happy even though it got me a lot of bad ink, I'm very - I'm very happy lot of bad ink, I'm very - I'm very happy lot of bad ink.
I'm very - I'm very happy so and I want to thank you. Thank you so and I want to thank you. Thank you so and I want to thank you. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. You know, somebody said you have fixed in, you know, somebody said you have fixed in, you know, somebody said you have fixed in and I said I really do when I do and I said I really do when I do and I said I really do when I do something wrong and we all do things something wrong and we all do things something wrong and we all do things wrong, I guess right that do often.
But we wrong I guess right that do often. But we wrong I guess right that do often. But we do things from when I do things wrong, do things from when I do things wrong, do things from when I do things wrong and the press rates badly about me, I can - and the press rates badly about me, I can and the press rates badly About me, I can handle that.
I - in fact I congratulate handle that I - in fact I congratulate handle that I - in fact I congratulate them them them. I say it's fine when you do things that I say it's fine when you do things that I say it's fine when you do things that are good things and they try and make it are good things and they try and make it are good things and They try and make it look like it's bad, that's when it's not look like it's bad, that's when it's not look like it's bad, that's when - it's not fair and that's when you have to fight fair.
And that's when you have to fight fair. And that's when you have to fight back, you have to fight for your rights back. You have to fight for your rights back. You have to fight for your rights. Folks. Remember that you have to fight folks. Remember that you have to fight folks. Remember that you have to fight for your life.
So here's the story. We're for your life. So here's the story. We're for your life. So here's the story. We're gonna build our military bigger, better gonna build our military bigger, better gonna build our military bigger, better and stronger than ever before. And I was - and stronger than ever before and I was and stronger than ever before and I was against the war in Iraq and Hillary against the war in Iraq and Hillary against the war in Iraq.
And Hillary Clinton was important. You know, now she's Clinton was important, you know, now she's Clinton was important. You know, now she's saying Donald Trump. Do you trust him saying Donald Trump, do you trust him saying Donald Trump? Do you trust him with the nukes? Let me tell you my with the nukes, let me tell you my - with the nukes, let me tell you my temperament is so much tougher and so temperament is so much tougher and so temperament is so much tougher and so much better than her temperament.
And by much better than her temperament and by much better than her temperament. And by the way, we need a tough temperament and the way we need a tough temperament and the way we need a tough temperament and all of these countries. And remember this, all of these countries and remember this all of these countries and remember this, all of these countries that are our - all of these countries that are our - all of these countries that are our allies.
She talked about our allies, our allies. She talked about our allies, our allies, she talked about our allies, our allies, think we're very stupid. People allies think we're very stupid. People allies think we're very stupid people because we defend Japan. And I'm okay because we defend Japan. And I'm okay because we defend Japan and I'm okay with that, but we can't defend them and with that.
But we can't defend them and with that. But we can't defend them and lose a fortune and that's what's lose a fortune and that's what's lose a fortune. And that's what's happening, right? We can't - we are not a happening, right? We can't - we are not a happening, right? We can't - we are not a rich country.
We're a poor country, we're rich country. We're a poor country, we're rich country. We're a poor country. We're a country that owes 19 trillion dollars, a country that owes 19 trillion dollars a country that owes 19 trillion dollars, soon to be 21 trillion dollars. We have soon to be 21 trillion dollars.
We have soon to be 21 trillion dollars. We have Obamacare, which is a disaster, did you Obamacare, which is a disaster, did you Obamacare, which is a disaster did you see in Texas today? See in Texas today see in Texas today Blue Cross Blue Cross Blue Shield in Blue Cross Blue Cross Blue Shield in Blue Cross Blue Cross Blue Shield in Texas, Blue Cross Blue Shield Texas just Texas Blue Cross Blue Shield Texas just Texas Blue Cross Blue Shield Texas.
Just announced they go through Obamacare that announced they go through Obamacare that announced they go through Obamacare that they're gonna have to raise it up 60 %. They're gonna have to raise it up 60 %. They're gonna have to raise it up 60 %, 60 %. In other words, you're gonna have a 60 %. In other words, you're gonna have a 60 %. In other words, you're gonna have a 60 % increase, Blue Cross Blue Shield 60 % increase, Blue Cross Blue Shield 60 % increase, Blue Cross Blue Shield Texas.
This is gonna happen all over a Texas. This is gonna happen all over a Texas. This is gonna happen all over. A lot of these numbers are going to do on lot of these numbers are going to do on lot of these numbers are going to do on November 1st Obama's trying to make it November 1st Obama's trying to make it November 1st Obama's trying to make it.
So that instead of November 1st, it's so that instead of November 1st, it's so that instead of November 1st it's going to be December after the election going to be December after the election going to be December after the election. We can't let them do that. We can't let them do that. We can't let them do that because I'll tell you what just on that because I'll tell you what just on that because I'll tell you what, just on that point alone, they lose the election on point alone.
They lose the election on point alone. They lose the election on guns alone. Hillary Clinton loses the guns alone. Hillary Clinton loses the guns alone. Hillary Clinton loses the election on the second matter, the second election on the second matter, the second election on the second matter. The second month, so we're going to rebuild our month, so we're going to rebuild our month.
So we're going to rebuild our military. Our military is very sadly military. Our military is very sadly military. Our military is very sadly depleted. You have to see the numbers, the depleted, you have to see the numbers. The depleted, you have to see the numbers, the number of chips we have compared to number of chips we have compared to number of chips we have compared to 15-20 years ago.
The number of soldiers 15-20 years ago, the number of soldiers 15-20 years ago, the number of soldiers, the number of everything, our equipment, the number of everything, our equipment, the number of everything our equipment is. All I saw on CNN, I thought it was, is all I saw on CNN, I thought it was, is all I saw on CNN. I thought it was amazing.
CNN did a profile of our pilots, amazing CNN did a profile of our pilots, amazing CNN did a profile of our pilots and the planes and they're talking these and the planes and they're talking these and the planes and they're talking. These pilots are great pals. Jet fighter pilots, pilots are great pals.
Jet fighter pilots, pilots are great pals. Jet fighter pilots, these are great people, great people and these are great people, great people and these are great people, great people and they show a plane that's like 70. I think they show a plane that's like 70. I think they show a plane that's like 70, I think was an f-18. It was like 17 or 18 years was an f-18. It was like 17 or 18 years was an f-18. It was like 17 or 18 years old and it looked it and they said and old and it looked it and they said and old and it looked it and they said and these were active fighter planes with - these were active fighter planes with - these were active Fighter planes with fantastic people at the helm, fighting fantastic people at the helm, fighting fantastic people at the helm, fighting and they said no, the planes are very old and they said no.
The planes are very old and they said no. The planes are very old and they're falling apart and what we do and they're falling apart and what we do and they're falling apart. And what we do is we go to the plane graveyard, did is we go to the plane graveyard, did is we go to the plane graveyard, did anyone see that?
And we take parts, we anyone see that and we take parts. We anyone see that and we take parts, we take parts off old planes that are take parts off old planes that are take parts off old planes that are sitting in the graveyards. And we take sitting in the graveyards and we take sitting in the graveyards and we take parts off planes that are in museums.
Did parts off planes that are in museums, did parts off planes that are in museums? Did you see that? And we use the parts that you see that and we use the parts that you see that and we use the parts that we put him on the planes that we fly him. We put him on the planes that we fly him. We put him on the planes that we fly him and the pilot said he was there for like and the pilot said he was there for like and the pilot said he was there for like 15 years, 15 years, 15 years.
He said, no, I'm - I'm gonna get out, it's so he said, no, I'm I'm gonna get out. It's so he said, no, I'm I'm gonna get out. It's so sad to see that's what's happening. Sad to see that's what's happening. Sad to see that's what's happening the United States, we can't let that the United States we can't let that the United States we can't let that happen happen happen.
We can't let it happen. Why aren't we? We can't let it happen. Why aren't we? We can't let it happen. Why aren't we getting beautiful new equipment, why getting beautiful new equipment, why getting beautiful new equipment? Why aren't we doing it and other nations are, aren't we doing it and other nations are aren't we doing it?
And other nations are putting up brand new beautiful, new putting up brand new, beautiful, new putting up brand new beautiful new planes. And we don't have it. It's not planes and we don't have it, it's not planes and we don't have it. It's not gonna happen any longer. We're gonna gonna happen any longer.
We're gonna gonna happen any longer. We're gonna build up our military bigger, better and build up our military bigger, better and build up our military bigger, better and stronger than ever before. I cook at stronger than ever before. I cook at stronger than ever before I cook at Hillary said, Oh Hillary said, Oh Hillary said, Oh Donald Trump his finger on the button.
Donald Trump his finger on the button. Donald Trump his finger on the button. I'm the one that didn't want to go into. I'm the one that didn't want to go into, I'm the one that didn't want to go into Iraq folks, and she's the one that Iraq folks and she's the one that Iraq folks and she's the one that stupidly raised her hand to go into Iraq.
Stupidly raised her hand to go into Iraq, stupidly raised her hand to go into Iraq and destabilize the entire Middle East and destabilize the entire Middle East and destabilize the entire Middle East. Okay. Cuz, that's what she did. So that's okay cuz, that's what she did. So that's okay cuz, that's what she did.
So that's it. So folks, here's the story it. So folks, here's the story it. So folks, here's the story. We have a country that we love. We have a - we have a country that we love. We have a - we have a country that we love, we have a country that's not working very well country, that's not working very well country.
That's not working very well anymore. We have a country that's anymore - we have a country that's anymore we have a country that's probably on a bubble because you look at probably on a bubble because you look at probably on a bubble because you look at interest rates are low and yet nobody interest Rates are low and yet nobody interest rates are low and yet nobody can borrow the money because rules and can borrow the money because rules and can borrow the money because rules and regulations are so bad that if somebody regulations are so bad that if somebody regulations Are so bad that if somebody wanted to do a great job, whether it's a wanted to do a great job, whether it's a wanted to do a great job, whether it's a real estate job or manufacturing job or real estate job or manufacturing job or real estate Job or manufacturing job or any kind of a job, they can't borrow any kind of a job.
They can't borrow any kind of a job. They can't borrow money from their bank. So unless you're money from their bank, so unless you're money from their bank. So unless you're rich as hell, I can borrow money and rich as hell I can borrow money and rich as hell I can borrow money and offer. But I don't need it offer, but I don't need it offer, but I don't need it.
The banks are calling me why don't you - the banks are calling me why don't you - the banks are calling me why don't you borrow money? I don't need money. If you borrow money, I don't need money. If you borrow money, I don't need money. If you need money, you can't borrow if you want need money, you can't borrow if you want need money, you can't borrow.
If you want to put people to work, you can't borrow to put people to work. You can't borrow to put people to work. You can't borrow it. Dodd-frank is a disaster by the way it - dodd-frank is a disaster. By the way it - dodd-frank is a disaster. By the way, it's a decision. They have very good. It's a decision they have very good.
It's a decision they have very good bankers and they're gonna make some bad bankers and they're gonna make some bad bankers and they're gonna make some bad deals. They have very good bankers. They deals, they have very good bankers. They deals, they have very good bankers. They can't even who's running the bank's can't even who's running the bank's can't even who's running the bank's right now with the regulators.
They can't right now with the regulators, they can't right now with the regulators, they can't loan money to people that want to create loan money to people that want to create loan money to people that want to create jobs. That's part of the problem there. Jobs. That's part of the problem there, jobs, that's part of the problem.
There are a lot of problems. There are a lot of are a lot of problems. There are a lot of - are a lot of problems, there are a lot of problems, but that's one of them. So folks problems, but that's one of them. So folks problems, but that's one of them. So folks, here's our story. We're gonna change. Here's our story.
We're gonna change. Here's our story. We're gonna change things in this country. We're gonna get things in this country, we're gonna get things in this country. We're gonna get rid of regulations. I was with in West rid of regulations. I was with in West rid of regulations I was with in West Virginia. Did you see that?
I won by the Virginia, did you see that? I won by the Virginia, did you see that? I won by the biggest number. I think anyone's ever biggest number. I think anyone's ever biggest number. I think anyone's ever gotten gotten gotten and when I won New York by a record and when I won New York by a record and when I won New York by a record margin won almost everything in New York, margin won almost everything in New York.
Margin won almost everything in New York, it was like unbelievable. Remember they - it was like unbelievable. Remember they - it was like unbelievable. Remember, they used to say he could crack 50 guys like used to say he could crack 50 guys like used to say he could crack 50 guys like Charles Krauthammer.
Donald Trump cannot Charles Krauthammer. Donald Trump cannot Charles Krauthammer. Donald Trump cannot crack 50. I said I got 16 guys in the crack 50, I said I got 16 guys. In the crack 50, I said I got 16 guys in the race. How do you break 50? Then I broke 50 race, how do you break 50? Then I broke 50 race.
How do you break 50? Then I broke 50 and it was like that's not very good. You and it was like that's not very good. You and it was like that's not very good. You should do better than that, should do better than that should do better than that. Let me tell you, these are inherently, let me tell you, these are inherently, let me tell you, these are inherently - these are inherently dishonest people.
These are inherently dishonest people. These are inherently dishonest people. Now I got 78, but you know when you have now I got 78, but you know when you have now I got 78, but you know when you have - so we started off with 17 when you have - so we started off with 17 when you have. So we started off with 17 when you have 14, 12, 10, nine, six people even in New 14, 12, 10, nine, six people even in New 14, 12, 10, nine, six people even in New York.
I had three, two good guys, Ted Cruz, York, I had three. Two good guys, Ted Cruz, York. I had three - two good guys, Ted Cruz, John Kasich, but I had three - no, I want to - John Kasich, but I had three. No, I want to - John Kasich, but I had three. No, I want to save that now. For Hillary lyin' lyin' save that now for Hillary lyin' lyin' save that now for Hillary lyin', lyin' Hillary that lyin Hillary, that lyin Hillary, that lyin she is the lion.
No, Ted Cruz is no longer. She is the lion. No, Ted Cruz is no longer. She is the lion. No, Ted Cruz is no longer a liar. We don't say lyin, Ted anymore. We a liar. We don't say lyin Ted anymore. We a liar. We don't say lyin Ted anymore. We love Ted, we love right. We love now, we don't want to say lyin, Ted, I'd now - we don't want to say lyin, Ted.
I'd now - we don't want to say lyin, Ted, I'd love to pull it out and just use it a love to pull it out and just use it a love to pull it out and just use it a lyin, crooked Hillary left aside because lyin crooked Hillary Left aside, because lyin crooked Hillary left aside, because she is a liar, she made up by foreign.
She is a liar. She made up by foreign. She is a liar. She made up by foreign policy. Donald Trump is going to do this policy. Donald Trump is going to do this policy. Donald Trump is going to do this. I said I never said that. Then Donald, I said I never said that. Then Donald, I said I never said that then Donald Trump is going to do that and a friend.
Trump is going to do that and a friend Trump is going to do that. And a friend of I was in the room said you never said of - I was in the room said you never said of - I was in the room said you never said you're gonna do that. I said that's right. You're gonna do that. I said that's right. You're gonna do that.
I said that's right. She makes it up. Now. She's a bad person. She makes it up. Now she's a bad person. She makes it up. Now she's a bad person. So here's the story. Folks, we don't win. So here's the story. Folks, we don't win. So here's the story. Folks. We don't win anymore. We're gonna start winning.
We're anymore. We're gonna start winning. We're anymore. We're gonna start winning. We're gonna win with our military. We're gonna gonna win with our military, we're gonna gonna win with our military. We're gonna knock the hell out of Isis. We have no knock the hell out of Isis. We have no knock the hell out of Isis.
We have no choice. But it knock the hell out, we're choice, but it knock the hell out. We're choice, but it knock the hell out. We're going to win it our border, we're going going to win it our border, we're going going to win it our border, we're going to build the wall, it's going to be a big to build the wall.
It's going to be a big to build the wall. It's going to be a big fat, beautiful wall. We're going to stop fat, beautiful wall. We're going to stop fat, beautiful wall. We're going to stop drugs from coming in and we're gonna drugs from coming in and we're gonna drugs from coming in and we're gonna have people coming into our country and have people coming into our country and have people coming into our country.
And they're going to be coming in. A lot of they're going to be coming in. A lot of they're going to be coming in a lot of them, but they're gonna come in Legally them. But they're gonna come in Legally them. But they're gonna come in Legally, they're coming in Legally. We're gonna, they're coming in Legally.
We're gonna, they're coming in Legally. We're gonna get rid of common core. We're bringing - get rid of common core. We're bringing - get rid of common core. We're bringing our education local, so important, our education local, so important, our education local. So important. We're going to repeal and replace.
We're going to repeal and replace. We're going to repeal and replace horrible expensive disgusting, Obamacare, horrible, expensive disgusting, Obamacare, horrible, expensive disgusting Obamacare. We're going to replace it with something we're gonna save our Second Amendment. We're gonna save our Second Amendment.
We're gonna save our Second Amendment from Hillary and all these people that from Hillary and all these people that from Hillary and all these people that want to want to want to - we're going to a point beautiful. We're going to a point beautiful. We're going to a point beautiful, incredible, unbelievable Supreme Court, incredible, unbelievable Supreme Court, incredible, unbelievable Supreme Court justices as close to Justice Scalia as justices as close to Justice Scalia as justices as close to Justice Scalia as we can get, he was been great.
We are - we can get - he was been great, we are - we can get - he was been great. We are going to make trade deals that are going going to make trade deals that are going, going to make trade deals that are going to bring jobs back to the United States to bring jobs back to the United States to bring jobs back to the United States we're not going to let them devalue.
We're not going to let them devalue. We're not going to let them devalue their currencies and take our jobs away their currencies and take our jobs away their currencies and take our jobs away from us. We're going to start making our - from us, we're going to start making our - from us, we're going to start making our own Goods from now on folks.
We're going own Goods from now on folks. We're going own Goods from now on folks. We're going to create jobs. We're going to create to create jobs, we're going to create to create jobs, we're going to create wealth for our country and we're going wealth for our country and we're going wealth for our country and we're going to be proud of our country again and we are Going to start winning again and we are going to start winning again and we are going to start winning again.
We're gonna win in so many different. We're gonna win in so many different. We're gonna win in so many different ways. You're gonna be begging me, you're ways you're gonna be begging me, you're ways you're gonna be begging me, you're gonna be so upset, you're gonna be saying gonna be so upset, you're gonna be saying gonna be so upset.
You're gonna be saying mr. president, we're winning too much, sir. Mr. president, we're winning too much, sir. Mr. president, we're winning too much, sir. We don't want to win so much and I'm - we don't want to win so much and I'm - we don't want to win. So much and I'm gonna say I don't care, we're gonna keep gonna say I don't care, we're gonna keep gonna say I don't care.